Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.56.080

Failure to pay in excess of plan, effect.

The failure of a bank operating under such a plan to pay to a creditor at any time a sum greater than the plan then requires, shall not constitute a default nor authorize or require the director to take charge of or liquidate the bank nor entitle the creditor to maintain an action against the bank.

[ 1994 c 92 s 155; 1955 c 33 s 30.56.080. Prior: 1933 c 49 s 8; RRS 3293-8. Formerly RCW 30.56.080.]